Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB3.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.6941 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 164.6941 to 164.6951, unless context otherwise requires:
(1) "Affiliated corporation" means an entity created or designated by the governing board of an institution
under KRS 164A.610 by adopted resolution["Affiliated organization" means an entity whose primary purpose
includes supporting or benefitting an institution or an institution's intercollegiate athletics program or an
officer, director, or employee of such an entity];
(2) "Agency contract" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6903;
(3) "Athlete agent" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6903;
(4) "Compensation" means anything of value, monetary or otherwise, including but not limited to cash, gifts, in-
kind items of value, social media compensation, payments for licensing or use of publicity rights, payments for
other intellectual or intangible property rights under federal or state law, and any other form of payment or
remuneration, but shall exclude:
(a) Tuition, room, board, books, fees, and personal expenses that a postsecondary educational institution
provides a student-athlete in accordance with the rules of the intercollegiate athletic association of
which the institution is a member;
(b) Federal Pell Grants and other state and federal grants or scholarships unrelated to and not awarded
because of a student-athlete's participation in intercollegiate athletics or sports competitions;
(c) Any other financial aid, benefits, or awards that an institution provides a student-athlete in accordance
with the rules of the intercollegiate athletic association of which the institution is a member; or
(d) The payment of wages and benefits to a student-athlete by an institution for work actually performed,
but not for athletic ability or participation in intercollegiate athletics, at a rate commensurate with the
prevailing rate for similar work in the locality of the institution;
(5) "Enrolled" has the same meaning as in KRS 164.6903;
(6) "Image" means a picture or video of the student-athlete;
(7) "Institutional agreement" means a written contract or agreement between a student-athlete and an
institution or its affiliated corporations that gives compensation to the athlete, including but not limited to
sharing revenue as permitted or as required by a legal settlement or applicable law. Such compensation may
be in exchange for the use of the student athlete's name, image, or likeness, institutional brand promotion,
or other rights;
(8) "Intercollegiate athletic association" or "association" means any athletic association, athletic conference, or
other similar organization which acts as an organizing, sanctioning, scheduling, or rule-making body of
intercollegiate athletic events in which postsecondary educational institutions take part, or an officer, director,
or employee of such entities;
(9)[(8)] "Intercollegiate athletics" has the same meaning as "intercollegiate sport" in KRS 164.6903;
(10)[(9)] "Likeness" means a physical, digital, or other depiction or representation of the student-athlete;
(11)[(10)] "Name" means the first, middle, or last name, or nickname of the student-athlete when used in a context
that reasonably identifies the student-athlete with particularity, which may include a team number, symbol,
logo, or brand;
(12)[(11)] "Name, image, and likeness agreement" or "NIL agreement" means a written contract or agreement
between a student-athlete and a third party that gives compensation to the athlete in exchange for the use of the
athlete's name, image, or likeness;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(13)[(12)] "Official team activities" means activities a postsecondary educational institution requires a student-
athlete to participate in as part of an institutional agreement or other[a] written team contract that includes
but is not limited to games, practices, exhibitions, scrimmages, trainings, meetings, team appearances, team
photograph and video sessions, individual photograph and video sessions, media interviews and appearances,
marketing activities, team travel, and institutional camps and clinics;
(14)[(13)] "Postsecondary educational institution" or "institution" means a public or private Kentucky college,
university, or community college that participates in intercollegiate athletics, or an officer, director, or
employee of such institutions;
(15) "Prevailing range of compensation" means a range of compensation for a valid business purpose related to
the promotion or endorsement of goods or services provided to the general public for profit, with
compensation at rates and terms commensurate with compensation paid to similarly situated student-
athletes who are not current or prospective student-athletes at the institution[(14) "Prevailing market
rate" means a rate that is tethered to the value of the consideration the student-athlete provides in an NIL
agreement and that is reasonable based on a comparison with:
(a) Student-athletes of similar skill and experience in that sport;
(b) Student-athletes of similar notoriety; and
(c) NIL agreement compensation in similar markets];
(16)[(15)] "Prospective student-athlete" means a person who is not currently enrolled in a postsecondary
educational institution but has been identified by that institution for possible recruitment and participation in
intercollegiate athletics;
(17)[(16)] "Recruit" or "recruitment" means to attempt to influence a person's choice of postsecondary educational
institution;
(18)[(17)] "Student-athlete" means a person who:
(a) Has entered into an institutional agreement or other[a] contract to enroll and participate in
intercollegiate athletics as an athlete at an institution; or
(b) Is enrolled and participates as an athlete in intercollegiate athletics at an institution; and
(19)[(18)] "Third party" means a person or entity, other than an institution, affiliated corporation[organization], or
an association, that offers, solicits, or enters into an NIL agreement.
Section 2. KRS 164.6943 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An institution or an association shall not prohibit a student-athlete from lawfully earning compensation
through a name, image, and likeness agreement with a third party, except as otherwise agreed to in an
institutional agreement between the student-athlete and the institution or affiliated organization, or from
obtaining an athlete agent and shall not penalize an athlete for doing so. However, an institution or an
intercollegiate athletic association may require that compensation be consistent with the prevailing range of
compensation.
(2) An institution shall not revoke a student-athlete's scholarship or allow eligibility for a scholarship to be
adversely impacted because of an athlete lawfully earning compensation through an NIL agreement or
obtaining an athlete agent, unless the athlete has violated a reasonable restriction imposed by the institution
under KRS 164.6947. However, a student-athlete's need-based financial assistance or an academic scholarship
based in part on financial need may be affected by the income generated by an institutional agreement or an
NIL agreement.
(3) An association shall not prohibit an institution from participating in intercollegiate athletics due to an
institution's student-athlete lawfully earning compensation through an NIL agreement with a third party or
obtaining an athlete agent and shall not penalize an institution for its student-athlete doing so.
Section 3. KRS 164.6945 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A student-athlete may receive compensation for the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness through a
name, image, and likeness agreement with a third party. Such compensation shall be consistent with the
prevailing range of compensation for[market rate of] the authorized use of the athlete's name, image, or
likeness.

CHAPTER 10 3
(2) A student-athlete may receive compensation from an institution or its affiliated corporation including but
not limited to sharing revenue as permitted or required by a legal settlement or applicable law, by entering
into a written institutional agreement with the institution or affiliated corporation. Such compensation may
be in exchange for the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness, institutional brand promotion,
or other rights[(a) A person or entity shall not give or promise compensation for the use of the name, image,
or likeness of a current or prospective student-athlete to recruit or induce the athlete to enroll at any Kentucky
institution.
(b) A person or entity, regardless of residence, shall not give or promise compensation for the use of the
name, image, or likeness of a student-athlete enrolled at a Kentucky institution or of a prospective
student-athlete who has entered into an enrollment contract with a Kentucky institution with the
purpose of recruiting or inducing the student-athlete to enroll at another postsecondary educational
institution, regardless of the institution's location].
(3) An institution or affiliated corporation may designate, through contract, sublicense or other written
agreement, a media rights holder or one (1) or more other third parties with whom an institution's student-
athletes may directly enter into NIL agreements consistent with the prevailing range of compensation[An
institution, association, or affiliated organization shall not:
(a) Give or promise compensation for the use of an athlete's name, image, or likeness;
(b) Direct compensation to be given for the use of the athlete's name, image or likeness; or
(c) Negotiate any part of an NIL agreement on behalf of a prospective student-athlete].
(4) A student-athlete shall not enter into an NIL agreement to receive compensation from a third party relating to
the endorsement or promotion of:
(a) Sports betting;
(b) A controlled substance;
(c) A substance the student-athlete's intercollegiate athletic association forbids the athlete from using;
(d) Adult entertainment; or
(e) Products or services that would be illegal for the student-athlete to possess or receive.[
(5) The provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall apply to NIL agreement activities only to the
extent that an intercollegiate athletic association may lawfully regulate or restrict a student-athlete's
agreements to receive compensation in exchange for his or her name, image, or likeness in a manner identical
or substantially similar to that set forth in subsection (2) and (3) of this section, including as currently or may
be in the future modified by a court of competent jurisdiction, and the intercollegiate athletic association
chooses to do so.]
Section 4. KRS 164.6947 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Due to the critical mission of postsecondary educational institutions and the importance of integrity in an
institution's participation in intercollegiate athletics, the governing board of an institution may adopt a policy
governing the name, image, and likeness agreements of the institution's student-athletes. Any restrictions
included in the policy shall be reasonable and shall not be an undue burden on the student-athlete's ability to
earn compensation through NIL agreements. Reasonable restrictions shall be in writing and provided to all
student-athletes. The institution's policy shall ensure the equitable enforcement of restrictions. Reasonable
restrictions that an institution may choose to impose include but are not limited to:
(a) Prohibiting a student-athlete from entering into an NIL agreement for products or services that are
reasonably considered to conflict with the mission of the institution, in the same manner as any other
student would be prohibited;
(b) Forbidding or establishing the conditions for the institution's student-athletes' use of the institution's
intellectual property, such as trademarks, trade dress, and copyrights, in NIL agreement activities.
These conditions may include preferential conditions for activities involving the institution's partner
entities;
(c) Prohibiting a student-athlete from entering into any NIL agreement that would cause the athlete to miss
an official team activity;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Restricting a student-athlete's NIL agreement activities during official team activities;
(e) Requiring a student-athlete to participate in official team activities pursuant to the institutional
agreement or other written team contract, which may include the use of the name, image, or likeness of
the athlete; and
(f) Imposing disciplinary action under team, institution, or athletic association rules if a student-athlete
violates the provisions of KRS 164.6941 to 164.6951 or violates a reasonable restriction.
(2) (a) A student-athlete who wishes to enter into an NIL agreement with a third party shall submit the
potential agreement to an official designated by the institution in which the student is enrolled in a
manner designated by the institution. The institution shall have up to three (3) business days to review
the potential NIL agreement for conflicts with the provisions of KRS 164.6941 to 164.6951 or the
institution's reasonable restrictions and provide the student-athlete with a written notice of any conflicts
identified by the institution. The written notice from the institution may include recommendations or
identify concerns. After any conflicts are resolved, the student-athlete may then enter into the
agreement. Any subsequent proposed modifications to the agreement shall be submitted for review in
the same manner.
(b) The governing board of the institution shall adopt a policy to carry out the provisions of this subsection
that:
1. Designates the official to receive NIL agreement submissions;
2. Establishes NIL agreement review procedures;
3. Provides student-athletes with a process to appeal conflict determinations; and
4. Ensures review of appeals in a timely manner.
(3) An institution's employees, including athletics coaching staff, or an affiliated corporation's employees, shall
not be liable for any damages to a student-athlete's ability to earn compensation through an NIL agreement
with a third party resulting from decisions and actions routinely taken in the course of intercollegiate athletics.
However, nothing in this subsection shall protect [the institution or its ]employees from acts of gross
negligence, or wanton, willful, malicious, or intentional misconduct.
(4) An institution shall provide the institution's student-athletes with a financial literacy and life skills education
workshop for a minimum of five (5) hours at the beginning of the athlete's first and third academic years. The
education shall, at a minimum, include information concerning financial aid, debt management, saving and
budgeting best practices, time management, available academic resources, and the skills necessary for success
as a student-athlete. The workshop shall also provide social media and brand management education. The
workshop shall not include any marketing, advertising, or referral for, or solicitation by, providers of financial,
marketing, branding, or other NIL agreement products or services.
(5) An institution's governing board may establish a program to provide NIL agreement resources and ongoing
support to the institution's student-athletes. The mission and the extent of the program shall be established by
the governing board and may include:
(a) Providing impartial analysis of potential NIL agreements;
(b) Referring third parties soliciting potential NIL agreements to student-athletes or their athlete agents; and
(c) Maintaining educational resources on name, image, and likeness for student-athlete use.
(6) An institution's governing board may establish a program to provide NIL agreement resources as it relates to
student-athletes to the general public and potential third-party licensees.
(7) For the purposes of the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884, a student-athlete's institutional
agreement or an NIL agreement submitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section to a public postsecondary
institution and the information obtained from the agreement shall be considered as containing information of a
personal nature where the public disclosure thereof would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of
personal privacy under KRS 61.878 and not subject to disclosure.
Section 5. KRS 164.6949 is amended to read as follows:
Nothing in KRS 164.6941 to 164.6951 shall be interpreted as:

CHAPTER 10 5
(1) Waiving the immunity of any public postsecondary educational institution or its employees, agents, or
authorized volunteers beyond any waiver for actions brought on a written institutional agreement under
KRS 45A.245;
(2) Granting name, image, or likeness rights or requiring compensation for the use of the name, image, or likeness
of any student-athlete prior to March 9, 2022;
(3) Establishing student-athletes as employees or independent contractors of an institution or an association; or
(4) Modifying the powers or waiving the rules or regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education or the agency
designated to manage interscholastic athletics under KRS 156.070.
Section 6. KRS 164.6951 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "student-athlete" shall have the same meaning as in KRS 164.6903.
(2) For all student-athletes enrolled in institutions within the Commonwealth, all institutional agreements, NIL
agreements, and agency contracts shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth.
(3) The parent or guardian of a minor student-athlete may enter the minor into an NIL agreement or an agency
contract on the minor's behalf. However, the minor shall reaffirm the NIL agreement or agency contract within
thirty (30) days of reaching the age of eighteen (18) or the contract or agreement shall be revoked.
(4) A student-athlete or prospective student-athlete shall reaffirm an NIL agreement or an agency contract, either
of which was formed or reaffirmed before or while the student-athlete was participating in intercollegiate
athletics at an institution, within thirty (30) days of the student-athlete no longer participating in intercollegiate
athletics at that institution or the contract or agreement shall be revoked.
Section 7. KRS 156.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall have the management and control of the common schools and all
programs operated in these schools, including interscholastic athletics, the Kentucky School for the Deaf, the
Kentucky School for the Blind, and community education programs and services.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education may designate an organization or agency to manage interscholastic athletics
in the common schools, provided that the rules, regulations, and bylaws of any organization or agency so
designated shall be approved by the board, and provided further that any administrative hearing conducted by
the designated managing organization or agency shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(a) The state board or its designated agency shall assure through promulgation of administrative regulations
that if a secondary school sponsors or intends to sponsor an athletic activity or sport that is similar to a
sport for which National Collegiate Athletic Association members offer an athletic scholarship, the
school shall sponsor the athletic activity or sport for which a scholarship is offered. The administrative
regulations shall specify which athletic activities are similar to sports for which National Collegiate
Athletic Association members offer scholarships.
(b) Beginning with the 2003-2004 school year, the state board shall require any agency or organization
designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics to adopt bylaws that establish as
members of the agency's or organization's board of control one (1) representative of nonpublic member
schools who is elected by the nonpublic school members of the agency or organization from regions
one (1) through eight (8) and one (1) representative of nonpublic member schools who is elected by the
nonpublic member schools of the agency or organization from regions nine (9) through sixteen (16).
The nonpublic school representatives on the board of control shall not be from classification A1 or D1
schools. Following initial election of these nonpublic school representatives to the agency's or
organization's board of control, terms of the nonpublic school representatives shall be staggered so that
only one (1) nonpublic school member is elected in each even-numbered year.
(c) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall not
promulgate rules, administrative regulations, or by laws that prohibit pupils in grades seven (7) to eight
(8) from participating in any high school sports except for high school varsity soccer and football, or
from participating on more than one (1) school-sponsored team at the same time in the same sport. The
Kentucky Board of Education, or an agency designated by the board to manage interscholastic athletics,
may promulgate administrative regulations restricting, limiting, or prohibiting participation in high
school varsity soccer and football for students who have not successfully completed the eighth grade.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics
shall allow a member school's team or students to play against students of a nonmember at-home
private school, or a team of students from nonmember at-home private schools, if the
nonmember at-home private schools and students comply with this subsection.
2. A nonmember at-home private school's team and students shall comply with the rules for
student-athletes, including rules concerning:
a. Age;
b. School semesters;
c. Scholarships;
d. Physical exams;
e. Foreign student eligibility; and
f. Amateurs.
3. A coach of a nonmember at-home private school's team shall comply with the rules concerning
certification of member school coaches as required by the state board or any agency designated
by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics.
4. This subsection shall not allow a nonmember at-home private school's team to participate in a
sanctioned:
a. Conference;
b. Conference tournament;
c. District tournament;
d. Regional tournament; or
e. State tournament or event.
5. This subsection does not allow eligibility for a recognition, award, or championship sponsored
by the state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic
athletics.
6. A nonmember at-home private school's team or students may participate in interscholastic
athletics permitted, offered, or sponsored by the state board or any agency designated by the state
board to manage interscholastic athletics.
(e) Every local board of education shall require an annual medical examination performed and signed by a
physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or chiropractor, if performed within
the professional's scope of practice, for each student seeking eligibility to participate in any school
athletic activity or sport. The Kentucky Board of Education or any organization or agency designated
by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall not promulgate administrative regulations or
adopt any policies or bylaws that are contrary to the provisions of this paragraph.
(f) Any student who turns nineteen (19) years of age prior to August 1 shall not be eligible for high school
athletics in Kentucky. Any student who turns nineteen (19) years of age on or after August 1 shall
remain eligible for that school year only. An exception to the provisions of this paragraph shall be
made, and the student shall be eligible for high school athletics in Kentucky if the student:
1. Qualified for exceptional children services and had an individual education program developed
by an admissions and release committee (ARC) while the student was enrolled in the primary
school program;
2. Was retained in the primary school program because of an ARC committee recommendation;
and
3. Has not completed four (4) consecutive years or eight (8) consecutive semesters of eligibility
following initial promotion from grade eight (8) to grade nine (9).
(g) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall
promulgate administrative regulations or bylaws that provide that:

CHAPTER 10 7
1. A member school shall designate all athletic teams, activities, and sports for students in grades
six (6) through twelve (12) as one (1) of the following categories:
a. "Boys";
b. "Coed"; or
c. "Girls";
2. The sex of a student for the purpose of determining eligibility to participate in an athletic activity
or sport shall be determined by:
a. A student's biological sex as indicated on the student's original, unedited birth certificate
issued at the time of birth; or
b. An affidavit signed and sworn to by the physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse, or chiropractor that conducted the annual medical examination required
by paragraph (e) of this subsection under penalty of perjury establishing the student's
biological sex at the time of birth;
3. a. An athletic activity or sport designated as "girls" for students in grades six (6) through
twelve (12) shall not be open to members of the male sex.
b. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the eligibility of any student to
participate in an athletic activity or sport designated as "boys" or "coed"; and
4. Neither the state board, any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic
athletics, any school district, nor any member school shall entertain a complaint, open an
investigation, or take any other adverse action against a school for maintaining separate
interscholastic or intramural athletic teams, activities, or sports for students of the female sex.
(h) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics
shall promulgate administrative regulations that permit a school district to employ or assign
nonteaching or noncertified personnel or personnel without postsecondary education credit hours
to serve in a coaching position. The administrative regulations shall give preference to the hiring
or assignment of certified personnel in coaching positions.
2. A person employed in a coaching position shall be a high school graduate and at least twenty-one
(21) years of age and shall submit to a criminal background check in accordance with KRS
160.380.
3. The administrative regulations shall specify post-hire requirements for persons employed in
coaching positions.
4. The regulations shall permit a predetermined number of hours of professional development
training approved by the state board or its designated agency to be used in lieu of postsecondary
education credit hour requirements.
5. A local school board may specify post-hire requirements for personnel employed in coaching
positions in addition to those specified in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph.
(i) Unless permitted to be eligible for varsity athletics by any transfer rule, policy, or administrative
regulation promulgated by the state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics, any student who transfers enrollment from a district of residence to a
nonresident district under KRS 157.350(4)(b) after enrolling in grade nine (9) and participating in a
varsity sport shall be ineligible to participate in interscholastic athletics for one (1) calendar year from
the date of the transfer. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics may adopt rules, policies, and bylaws and promulgate administrative
regulations necessary to carry out this paragraph.
(j) No member school shall grant a student-athlete the right to use the member school's property, or
intellectual property, such as trademarks, school uniforms, and copyrights, in the student's earning of
compensation through name, image, and likeness activities. No student-athlete shall use school property
or such intellectual property in earning compensation through name, image, and likeness activities. The
state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics shall
promulgate administrative regulations to govern and enforce this paragraph.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education is hereby authorized to lease from the State Property and Buildings
Commission or others, whether public or private, any lands, buildings, structures, installations, and
facilities suitable for use in establishing and furthering television and related facilities as an aid or
supplement to classroom instruction throughout the Commonwealth and for incidental use in any other
proper public functions. The lease may be for any initial term commencing with the date of the lease
and ending with the next ensuing June 30, which is the close of the then-current fiscal biennium of the
Commonwealth, with exclusive options in favor of the board to renew the same for successive ensuing
bienniums, July 1 in each even year to June 30 in the next ensuing even year; and the rentals may be
fixed at the sums in each biennium, if renewed, sufficient to enable the State Property and Buildings
Commission to pay therefrom the maturing principal of and interest on, and provide reserves for, any
revenue bonds which the State Property and Buildings Commission may determine to be necessary and
sufficient, in agreement with the board, to provide the cost of acquiring the television and related
facilities with appurtenances and costs as may be incident to the issuance of the bonds.
(b) Each option of the Kentucky Board of Education to renew the lease for a succeeding biennial term may
be exercised at any time after the adjournment of the session of the General Assembly at which
appropriations shall have been made for the operation of the state government for such succeeding
biennial term, by notifying the State Property and Buildings Commission in writing, signed by the chief
state school officer, and delivered to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as a
member of the commission. The option shall be deemed automatically exercised, and the lease
automatically renewed for the succeeding biennium, effective on the first day thereof, unless a written
notice of the board's election not to renew shall have been delivered in the office of the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet before the close of business on the last working day in April
immediately preceding the beginning of the succeeding biennium.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall not itself operate leased television facilities, or undertake the
preparation of the educational presentations or films to be transmitted thereby, but may enter into one
(1) or more contracts to provide therefor, with any public agency and instrumentality of the
Commonwealth having, or able to provide, a staff with proper technical qualifications, upon which
agency and instrumentality the board, through the chief state school officer and the Department of
Education, is represented in such manner as to coordinate matters of curriculum with the curricula
prescribed for the public schools of the Commonwealth. Any contract for the operation of the leased
television or related facilities may permit limited and special uses of the television or related facilities
for other programs in the public interest, subject to the reasonable terms and conditions as the board and
the operating agency and instrumentality may agree upon; but any contract shall affirmatively forbid the
use of the television or related facilities, at any time or in any manner, in the dissemination of political
propaganda or in furtherance of the interest of any political party or candidate for public office, or for
commercial advertising. No lease between the board and the State Property and Buildings Commission
shall bind the board to pay rentals for more than one (1) fiscal biennium at a time, subject to the
aforesaid renewal options. The board may receive and may apply to rental payments under any lease
and to the cost of providing for the operation of the television or related facilities not only
appropriations which may be made to it from state funds, from time to time, but also contributions,
gifts, matching funds, devises, and bequests from any source, whether federal or state, and whether
public or private, so long as the same are not conditioned upon any improper use of the television or
related facilities in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection.
(4) The state board may, on the recommendation and with the advice of the chief state school officer, prescribe,
print, publish, and distribute at public expense such administrative regulations, courses of study, curriculums,
bulletins, programs, outlines, reports, and placards as each deems necessary for the efficient management,
control, and operation of the schools and programs under its jurisdiction. All administrative regulations
published or distributed by the board shall be enclosed in a booklet or binder on which the words
"informational copy" shall be clearly stamped or printed.
(5) Upon the recommendation of the chief state school officer or his or her designee, the state board shall establish
policy or act on all matters relating to programs, services, publications, capital construction and facility
renovation, equipment, litigation, contracts, budgets, and all other matters which are the administrative
responsibility of the Department of Education.
Section 8. Whereas the mission and successful operation of the state's postsecondary educational
institutions requires clear guidelines for the regulation of student-athlete compensation in intercollegiate athletics, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.

CHAPTER 10 9
Signed by Governor March 13, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version